Nevada, session 83, AB244.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 446 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 446.0145 to
446.069, inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 3. 1. A food dispensing establishment that has 10 or
more locations doing business in this State which offer a menu
consisting of substantially similar items shall not sell, prepare,
provide or transport food or beverages using a disposable
foodware container that is made wholly or partially from
polystyrene foam.
2. A person who willfully and knowingly violates the
provisions of this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
$100 per day for each day upon which such a violation occurs.
3. The provisions of this section do not apply to a food
dispensing establishment that has less than 10 locations doing
business in this State unless the food dispensing establishment has
1 or more locations doing business in states other than Nevada
that have prohibited the use of disposable foodware containers
made wholly or partially from polystyrene foam.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Disposable foodware container” means a single-use or
disposable item that is used for heating, preparing, packaging,
serving or transporting a prepared or ready-to-eat food or
beverage item. The term includes, without limitation, bowls, plates,
trays, cartons, clamshells, cups, lids, containers or condiment
cups.
(b) “Food dispensing establishment” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 597.7629.
(c) “Polystyrene foam” means blown polystyrene, commonly
known as Styrofoam, and expanded or extruded foams consisting
of thermoplastic petrochemical materials utilizing a styrene
monomer and processed by fusion, injection molding, foam
molding or extrusion blow molding.
Sec. 4. NRS 446.945 is hereby amended to read as follows:
446.945 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 446.872 [,] and
section 3 of this act, any person who violates any of the provisions
of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition thereto, such
persons may be enjoined from continuing such violations. Each day
upon which such a violation occurs shall constitute a separate
violation.
Sec. 5. Section 3 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 3. 1. A food dispensing establishment [that has
10 or more locations doing business in this State which offer
a menu consisting of substantially similar items] shall not
sell, prepare, provide or transport food or beverages using a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
disposable foodware container that is made wholly or
partially from polystyrene foam.
2. A person who willfully and knowingly violates the
provisions of this section is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed $100 per day for each day upon which such a
violation occurs.
3. [The provisions of this section do not apply to a food
dispensing establishment that has less than 10 locations doing
business in this State unless the food dispensing
establishment has 1 or more locations doing business in states
other than Nevada that have prohibited the use of disposable
foodware containers made wholly or partially from
polystyrene foam.
4.] As used in this section:
(a) “Disposable foodware container” means a single-use
or disposable item that is used for heating, preparing,
packaging, serving or transporting a prepared or ready-to-eat
food or beverage item. The term includes, without limitation,
bowls, plates, trays, cartons, clamshells, cups, lids, containers
or condiment cups.
(b) “Food dispensing establishment” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 597.7629.
(c) “Polystyrene foam” means blown polystyrene,
commonly known as Styrofoam, and expanded or extruded
foams consisting of thermoplastic petrochemical materials
utilizing a styrene monomer and processed by fusion,
injection molding, foam molding or extrusion blow molding.
Sec. 6. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 3 of this act,
if, before October 1, 2025, the owner or operator of a food
dispensing establishment, as defined in NRS 597.7629, purchased
disposable foodware containers, as defined in section 3 of this act,
that are made wholly or partially from polystyrene foam, as defined
in section 3 of this act, for use in or by the food dispensing
establishment, the food dispensing establishment may use any
remaining inventory of the disposable foodware containers until the
inventory of such disposable foodware containers is depleted.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and sections 1 to 4, inclusive, and 6 of
this act become effective on October 1, 2025.
2. Section 5 of this act becomes effective on January 1, 2029.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)